Maryland, session 2025, HB0940.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
6–220.1.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0940*

HOUSE BILL 940
(A) A COURT SHALL STAY THE ENTERING OF JUDGMENT, DEFER FURTHER
PROCEEDINGS, AND PLACE A DEFENDANT ON PROBATION BEFORE JUDGMENT,
SUBJECT TO REASONABLE CONDITIONS, IF:
(1) THE DEFENDANT PLEADS GUILTY OR NOLO CONTENDERE OR IS
FOUND GUILTY OF A CRIME;
(2) THE DEFENDANT IS DIAGNOSED WITH:
(I) AUTISM SPECTRUM DISORDER, AS DEFINED IN THE MOST
RECENT EDITION OF THE DIAGNOSTIC AND STATISTICAL MANUAL OF MENTAL
DISORDERS; OR
(II) AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY, AS DEFINED IN § 7–101 OF
THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE; AND
(3) THE COURT FINDS BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT:
(I) THE DEFENDANT’S CRIMINAL CONDUCT WAS A
MANIFESTATION OF THE DEFENDANT’S DISORDER OR DISABILITY; AND
(II) GRANTING THE PROBATION BEFORE JUDGMENT WOULD BE:
1. IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE DEFENDANT; AND
2. IN THE INTEREST OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND JUSTICE.
(B) IN MAKING A DETERMINATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, A COURT SHALL CONSIDER THE POSITION OF THE STATE AND ANY
STATEMENT MADE BY A VICTIM OR A VICTIM’S REPRESENTATIVE IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 11–403 OF THIS ARTICLE.
Article – Health – General
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) “Developmental disability” means a severe chronic disability of an individual
that:
(1) Is attributable to a physical or mental impairment, other than the sole
diagnosis of mental illness, or to a combination of mental and physical impairments;

HOUSE BILL 940 3
(2) Is manifested before the individual attains the age of 22;
(3) Is likely to continue indefinitely;
(4) Results in an inability to live independently without external support
or continuing and regular assistance; and
(5) Reflects the need for a combination and sequence of special,
interdisciplinary, or generic care, treatment, or other services that are individually planned
and coordinated for the individual.
(n) “Intellectual disability” means a developmental disability that is evidenced by
significantly subaverage intellectual functioning and impairment in the adaptive behavior
of an individual.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.